pt-PT: Tipo de corte: Ao metro; À jarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Peça pré-cortada; Rolo/peça; Amostra; Outro
en: Cut type: By the meter; By the yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Precut piece; Roll/bolt; Swatch/sample; Other
zh-TW: 裁售類型: 依公尺計; 依碼計; 寬八分之一碼; 寬四分之一碼; 預先裁切; 捲/匹; 布卡/樣品; 其他
hu: Vágás típusa: Méterre; Yardra; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Elővágott darab; Tekercs/vég; Anyagminta; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de corte: Por metro; Por jarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Peça pré-cortada; Rolo/peça; Amostra; Outros
sk-SK: Typ rezu: Na metre; Na yardy; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Vopred odrezaný kus; Rolka/balík; Vzorka/ukážka; Iné
bg-BG: Тип разкрояване: На метър; На ярд; Осмина парче (Fat eighth); Четвърт парче (Fat quarter); Предварително изрязано парче; Ролка/топ; Мостра; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta reza: Po metru; Po jardu; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Unaprijed izrezan komad; Rola/truba; Uzorak; Ostalo
it: Tipo di taglio: Al metro; Alla iarda; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Pezzo pretagliato; Rotolo/pezza; Campione; Altro
tr: Kesim tipi: Metreyle; Yardayla; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Önceden kesilmiş parça; Rulo/top; Örnek/numune; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de tăiere: La metru; La yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Bucată pretăiată; Rolă/balot; Mostră/eșantion; Altele
fi: Leikkaustyyppi: Metreittäin; Jaardeittain; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Valmiiksi leikattu pala; Rulla/pakka; Tilkku/näyte; Muu
cs: Typ řezu: Na metry; Na yardy; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Předřezaný kus; Role/štůček; Vzorek/vzorník; Jiné
zh-CN: 切割类型: 按米; 按码; 胖 1/8 码; 胖 1/4 码; 预裁片; 卷/匹; 小样/样品; 其他
nb: Kuttetype: Per meter; Per yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Ferdigkuttet stykke; Rull/balle; Stoffprøve/prøve; Annet
ru: Тип отреза: На метраж; На ярды; Восьмая часть ярда (fat eighth); Четверть ярда (fat quarter); Готовый отрез; Рулон; Лоскут/образец; Другое
fr: Type de coupe: Au mètre; Au yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Pièce prédécoupée; Rouleau/pièce; Échantillon; Autre
pl: Typ cięcia: Na metry; Na jardy; Tłusta ósemka; Tłusta ćwiartka; Wstępnie przycięty kawałek; Rolka / belka; Próbka; Inne
nl: Snijtype: Per meter; Per yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Voorgesneden stuk; Rol/stofrol; Staal/monster; Overig
lt-LT: Pjovimo tipas: Metrais; Jardais; „Fat eighth“; „Fat quarter“; Iš anksto atkirptas gabalas; Ritinys / rulonas; Pavyzdys; Kita
de: Schnittart: Meterware; Yardware; Fat Eighth; Fat Quarter; Vorgeschnittenes Stück; Rolle/Ballen; Muster/Probe; Sonstige
el: Τύπος κοπής: Με το μέτρο; Με τη γιάρδα; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Προκομμένο κομμάτι; Ρολό/τόπι; Δείγμα; Άλλο
sv: Skärtyp: Metervara; Yardvara; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Färdigklippt bit; Rulle/bal; Prov/provbit; Annat
ja: カットタイプ: メートル売り; ヤード売り; ファットエイス; ファットクォーター; プレカット; ロール / 反物; スワッチ / サンプル; その他
vi: Loại cắt: Theo mét; Theo yard; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Mảnh cắt sẵn; Cuộn/cây; Mẫu thử; Khác
es: Tipo de corte: Por metro; Por yarda; Octavo gordo; Cuarto gordo; Pieza precortada; Rollo/pieza; Muestra; Otro
da: Skæretype: Metermål; Yard-mål; Fat eighth; Fat quarter; Forskåret stykke; Rulle/balle; Stofprøve/prøve; Andet
th: ประเภทการตัด: ตามเมตร; ตามหลา; แฟตเอท; แฟตควอเตอร์; ชิ้นตัดสำเร็จ; ม้วน/พับ; แถบสี/ตัวอย่าง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta reza: Na meter; Na jard; Osmina jarda; Četrtina jarda; Vnaprej odrezan kos; Rola/bala; Vzorec; Drugo
ko: 절단 유형: 미터 단위; 야드 단위; 팻 에이스; 팻 쿼터; 프리컷 조각; 롤/볼트; 스와치/샘플; 기타